dictsource/fr_rules
    ai) s (em      s         // vraisemblable
   _al) s (ac      z         // Alsace
   aCè) s (_       s
    nè) s (_       s
 kansa) s (_       s         // Kansas, Arkansas
 aka) s (_       s
    ub) s (is      z         // subsister
  tran) s (A       z         // transition
  tran) s (e       s         // transe
  tran) s (ub      s         // transubstantiation
     A) s (A       z         // baiser
     A) s (oft     s         // microsoft
     A) s (ol_     s         // tournesol
     _) socio (@P5 sosio
     _) super (@@P5 sypEr
     _) super (_   sypEr
     _) supra (@P5 sypra
 batro) s (_       s
 océro) s (_       s
        scien (t   siA~      // conscient scientifique
        sql (_S3   EskyEl

    _u) s (_       s
    Cu) s (_
   L18) s (_+++			// list of words not caught by other rules. Force increase in score
   L19) s (_+++    s		// list of words not caught by other rules. Force increase in score
   Abu) s (_       s
  _Abu) s (_
   mbu) s (_       s
_cACpu) s (_       s
   Acu) s (_       s
  docu) s (_
   écu) s (_
   asu) s (_       s
   odu) s (_       s
    gu) s (_       s
   igu) s (_                 // aigus
    iu) s (_       s         // radius
    ïu) s (_       s         // laïus
  Culu) s (_       s         // cumulus
   plu) s (_       z2        // plus, surplus
   ylu) s (_       s         // stylus
    mu) s (_       s
   _mu) s (_
   ému) s (_
   opu) s (_       s         // opus, octopus
   Aru) s (_       s         // virus
   aru) s (_                 // disparus
  ouru) s (_                 // courus
   Anu) s (_       s         // bonus, tonus
   enu) s (_                 // menus, venus
   psu) s (_       s         // lapsus
 cessu) s (_       s         // processus

   atu) s (_       s         // stratus motus
   ctu) s (_       s         // cactus
   etu) s (_       s
  aitu) s (_
   itu) s (_       s
   ltu) s (_       s         // altus
   otu) s (_       s         // motus
  Cutu) s (_       s

  _tou) s (_       s

        s (b       z         // sbire
        s (d       z
        s (g       z
        s (j       z
        s (v       z
  _tou) s (_Ces_
  _tou) s (_des_   s
  _tou) s (_Cos_
  _tou) s (_leurs_

// group s: English section
        send  (_      _^_en
_)        server (X     _^_en
        sh (_      _^_en
        sh (Ap     _^_en     // shop, ship
        sh (At     _^_en     // shut, shot
_)	side (X+++	_^_en
L14)	side (X+++	_^_en
     _) sky        _^_en
     _) smil       _^_en     // smile, smiley
        spy        _^_en
_A)	s (_		_^_en
L13)	son (_		_^_en
L13)	ston (_		_^_en
    	stone (_	_^_en


.group t
        t          t         // bataille
     _) t (_       te
     -) t (-       t2
     _) t' (P2v    t
    Vn) t (_       t2
     A) t (-       t2
   VCi) t (_       t2
        t (_
  peti) t (_       t2

        th (L12++       t
        th (ArA++       t
        th (oCA         t
        th (All         t
        th (æ           t

   éCA) th (++          t
  éCAC) th (++          t
 éCACA) th (++          t

    an) th              t
    ar) th              t
   ari) th              t
    au) th              t
    ca) th              t
     e) th (n           t
     e) th (m           t
     é) th              t
     è) th              t
    en) th              t
  gori) th              t
   gna) th              t
     ï) th              t
    in) th              t
    li) th              t
    ma) th              t
   mal) th              t
    mi) th (r           t
    or) th              t
    my) th              t
  opis) th              t
  orni) th              t
    pa) th              t
    py) th              t
    ry) th              t
    yn) th              t

        th (erm         t
        th (ros         t
        th (rit         t
        th (rom         t
        th (ana         t
        th (aum         t

        ts (_S1    z2        // silent at end of word unless next word starts with a vowel
     C) t (_       t         // compost watt soft script malttact abrupt
    ki) t (_       t         // kit
     n) t (_
     r) t (_

   aul) t (_                 // Renault
 grani) t (_       t

     _) télé (@P4  tele
     _) tele       tele
     _) thermo (@P6 tErmo

        tt         t         // attitude

     s) th (m                // asthme
        th         t         // théorie
   hui) t (_       t3        // huit

     _) t          t         // tien tiers
    an) t (ia      t         // Santiago
     C) t (ieu     s         // contentieux

        t (io_     s         // ratio

   Ama) t (ieX     s         // diplomatie
     a) t (ia      s         // spatial
    en) t (ia      s         // confidentialit�
   lbu) t (iA      s         // balbutiait
     r) t (ia      s         // impartial
   ini) t (iA      s         // initier
     p) t (ia      s         // nuptial
    an) t (iat     s         // transsubstantiation

        t (ion     s         // programmation
     V) t (ion     t         // verbes
  ache) t (ion     t         // achetions, rachetions
    ai) t (ion     t         // souhaitions, traitions
    oi) t (ion     t         // boitions
    si) t (ion     s         // position
  chan) t (ion     t         // chantions, d�chantions
  Cisi) t (ion     t         // visitions
    ci) t (ions    t         // citions
  comp) t (ions    t         // comptions, escomptions
  CAnc) t (ion     s         // fonctionner, ponctionner
    Ce) t (ions    t         // jetions, rejetions
   Vec) t (ion     t         // respections
   Vep) t (ion     t         // respections
   éCi) t (ions    t         // hésitions, héritions
   éti) t (ion     s         // pétition
    Vé) t (ion     t         // répétions
  habi) t (ions    t         // habitions
   imi) t (ions    t         // imitions, limitions
   VAu) t (ion     t         // ajoutions
    lu) t (ion     s         // févolution
  Apor) t (ion     t         // emportions, exportions
  opor) t (ion     s         // proportion
  Cpor) t (ion     t         // emportions, exportions
   sor) t (ion     t         // sortions
    rê) t (ion     t         // arrêtions, apprêtions

     s) t (ion     t         // gestion
   _ta) t (ion     t         // tation
   sen) t (ion_    t         // sentions, ressentions
     t) t (ion     t         // combattions

        t (iel     s         // partiel
        t (ieu     s         // ambitieux
        t (iAm     s         // patiemment

   mar) t (ien     s         // martien vénitienne
     a) t (ien     s
     i) t (ien     s
     o) t (ien     s

   ipé) t (ieX     s
   amé) t (ieX     s
    nu) t (ieX     s         // minutie
    ni) tien (t_   si
    bu) tien (t_   si

   cra) t (ieX     s         // démocratie

   ner) t (ie      s         // inertie

   _ce) t (_       t
_transA) t (_      t

// group t: English section
        th (A      _^_en     // this
        th (K      _^_en     // month
     _) time       _^_en
        tle (_     _^_en
        too        _^_en
        ttl        _^_en
g)        ton (_     _^_en     // try, country
i)        t (uneX     _^_en
        try (_     _^_en     // try, country
  sCar) t (_       _^_en     // smart, start
  sCar) t (er_     _^_en     // starter
     _) tun (AX    _^_en


.group u
        u          y         // cruel nuage brut
        ue (il       W      // orgueil
        ui         yi       // nuit, fuite
        uin (K     yE~       // juin
    _C) u (rfX     W
   _bl) u (ff      W
    _s) u (rfeX    W
        uy (A      yij

     C) ucci       utSi      // capuccino
    _g) ua         wa
    ag) ua (X      wa
  Ctig) ua (_      wa
    _c) ul (_      y
     _) ultra (P5  yltra
     g) u (ay      u
  haïk) u (X       u

     C) u (bX      W         // hub, club
     C) u (gX      W         // bug, mug
    _n) u (rse     W         // nurse
    pr) unt (_     W~        // emprunt
        um (_      Om        // album
     f) um (_      W~        // parfum
        um (L11      W~        // humble
        un (C      W~        // emprunt lundi
        un (n      y         // tunnel
    CC) un (_      W~        // brun
    uc) un (_      W~n2      // aucun
        un (_      W~n2      // un avion
    _h) un (_      W~        // hun

    fl) ux (_      y         // flux, reflux
     g) u (A                 // fatigue
     g) u (ï       y         // ambiguïté
     g) u (ë       y         // ambiguë
     p) u (tsch      u         // putsch
        uz (z      W
g)	ua (l_	wa

// group u: English section
L03)        ual (_     _^_en     // usual
        uch (_     _^_en     // much
    _b) usi        _^_en     // business, businessman
     C) ui (ce     _^_en     // produice, juice
C)        ult (_   _^_en
        umber (_   _^_en
        ump (_     _^_en
     r) u (nX      _^_en     // run, autorun
        unch       _^_en
        under      _^_en     // under, understand, thunder
    _C) un (_      _^_en
    _C) un (ny     _^_en
     _) up (C      _^_en     // upper, update
        up (_      _^_en     // setup
        urn (X     _^_en     // burn, turn
        ust (_     _^_en     // just, trust
        uzz      _^_en     // buzz


.group ü
        ü          y
        üs (_      ys
        üm (_      om
        ül (_      yll


.group v
        v          v
        vers (_    vErz2
   dri) ver (X     vWr
        view (X    vju
     _) view (A    vjuv

// group v: English section
        voice (X   _^_en
        void (_    _^_en
        vy (_      _^_en


.group w
        w          w
     _) w (A       _|w
        w (ag++    v         // wagon

// group w: English section
     _) w (AC      _^_en
     _) w (ina     w
     _) w (Ai      _^_en
     _) w (Att	 w
     _) w (ACo     w
     _) we        _^_en
        wh      _^_en     // why whisky when
        wr         _^_en     // write
        war        _^_en     // war
        wav        _^_en     // wave
        way        _^_en     // way, away
A)        wn        _^_en
        wor        _^_en


.group x
        x          ks
        xx         ks
     _) x (A       gz        // xylophone
     _) x (CP1     iks       // xylophone
        xml (_S3   _|iksEmEl
     e) x (A       gz        // exagérer exemple
  L03e) x (A       ks        // annexe, vexer
  _ine) x (A       gz
    _e) x (h       gz        // exhumer

    ai) x (_                 // paix
    oi) x (_                 // voix
   pri) x (_                 // prix, but not matrix, bellatrix

  _soi) x (A       s         // soixante

    Au) x (_       z2        // faux feux choux

   _au) x (quel              // auxquels

   _di) x (_neuf   z         // liaison: dix-neuf
   _di) x (_       z3
   _si) x (_neu    s         // liaison: six-neuf
   _si) x (_       z3

    di) x (iè      z         // dixième
    si) x (iè      z         // sixième
   deu) x (iè      z         // deuxième


.group y
        y          i         // cryogénique myope
     _) y (A       _|j       // yak
     _) y (eu      j         // yeux
     _) yacht      _^_en     // yacht, yachtman

     _) yahoo (P5  ja'u
        ym (L11      E~        // tympan
        ym (_      E~        // thym
     X) ys (_      is

        yn (K         E~        // laryngite
        y (nn      i

// group y: English section
//_C)	y (_	_^_en
AC)	y (_	_^_en
C)	y (e_	_^_en
%C)	y (_	_^_en
ss)	y (_	i
@CeC)	y (_	_^_en
nC)	y (_	_^_en
      yze	_^_en


.group z
        z          z
     t) z          s         // tzigane
     t) zer (_     zEr
     C) zer (_     zWr


.group
// accented characters, these could have their own groups if they need more rules
        â          a:
        ñ          n^

        é          e         // été
        ê          E         // fête

        ö          o         // angström
        û          y:        // fûtes
        ü          y         // bülcher
